src/import/nouns.lexc
hüpostaas+N:hüpo#st´aas TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüpoteek+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h`üpot´eek TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüpotees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h`üpot´ees TAUD ;
hüpotensioon+N:hüpo#tensi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüpotenuus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüpoten´uus TAUD ;
hüpotermia+N:hüpot´ermia AASTA ;
hüpotoonia+N:hüpot´oonia AASTA ;
hüpotooniahaige+N:hüpot´oonia#h´aige AASTA ;
hüpotooniatõbi+N:hüpot´oonia#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
hüpotroofia+N:hüpo#tr´oofia AASTA ;
hüpotsenter+N:hüpo#ts´entE2r REDEL ;
hüppaja+N:h´üppaja AASTA ;
hüppamine+N:h´üppamine OLULINE ;
hüppeasend+N:h´üppe#asend REDEL ;
hüppeliiges+N:h´üppe#liiges SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüppelisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üppelisus OLULINE ;
hüppemägi+N:h´üppe#mäG1%{stemill%} NIMI ;
hüppenöör+N:h´üppe#n´öör TAUD ;
hüsteeria+N:hüst´eeria AASTA ;
hüsteeriahoog+N:hüst´eeria#h´ooG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüsteerik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüsteerik VIRSIK ;
hüsteerika+N:hüsteerika AASTA ;
hütike+N:hüt,ike PEENIKE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hütt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üt,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüvang+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüvang VIRSIK ;
hüvastijätmine+N:hüvasti#j´ätmine SUULINE ;
hüvastijätt+N:hüvasti#j´ätt%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
hüvastijätukiri+N:hüvasti#jätu#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
hüve+N:hüve PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüvis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüvis SOOLANE ;
hüvitamine+N:hüvitamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüvitis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüvitis OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüvitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüvitus OLULINE ;
hüvitusfond+N:hüvitus#f´ond TAUD ;
hüvitusmaks+N:hüvitus#m´aks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüään+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hü´ään TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüübimatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üübimatus OLULINE ;
hüübimine+N:h´üübimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüübivus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üübivus OLULINE ;
hüüdlause+N:h´üüd#l´ause PINGE ;
hüüdmine+N:h´üüdmine SUULINE ;
hüüdnimi+N:h´üüd#nim NIMI ;
hüüdsõna+N:h´üüd#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüümen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üümen REDEL ;
hüüp+N:h´üüp TAUD ;
hüüumärk+N:hüüu#m´ärk TAUD ;
hüüve+N:h´üüB2e PINGE ;
hüüvis+N:hüüvis SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüüvistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüüvistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Single@i-s+N:@P.Stem.Single@i-N1S1 HALE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ibeer+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ib´eer TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ibeeris+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ibeeris SOOLANE ;
@D.Case.Nom@ida+N:@D.Case.Nom@ida%{stemill%} KAVA ;
ida-uurija+N:ida-´uurija AASTA ;
idablokk+N:ida#bl´okk TAUD ;
idaeestlane+N:ida#´eestlane SUULINE ;
idakaar+N:ida#k´aar%{stemill%} KEEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idakaubandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ida#kaubandus OLULINE ;
idalane+N:idalane OLULINE ;
idamaa+N:ida#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
idamaalane+N:ida#m´aalane SUULINE ;
idanaaber+N:ida#n´aabE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idand REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idandus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idanevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idanevus SUULINE ;
idaosa+N:ida#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
idapiir+N:ida#p´iir RUUM ;
idarinne+N:ida#r´inD1e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idasagedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ida#sagedus OLULINE ;
idaturg+N:ida#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ideaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ide´aal TAUD ;
ideaalkuju+N:ide´aal#kuju KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ideaalsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ide´aalsus SUULINE ;
idealiseerija+N:idealis´eerija AASTA ;
idealism+N:ideal´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idealist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ideal´ist TAUD ;
idee+N:id´ee%>%{id%} PUU ;
ideedraama+N:id´ee#draama PERE ;
ideefiks+N:id´ee#f´iks TAUD ;
ideestik+N:id´eest´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ideetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@id´eetus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ideevaesus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@id´ee#v´aesus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@identifikaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@identifik´aator REDEL ;
identifitseerimine+N:identifits´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@identiteet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@identit´eet TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@identsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@id´entsus SUULINE ;
ideograafia+N:ideo#gr´aafia AASTA ;
ideogramm+N:ideo#gr´amm TAUD ;
ideologiseerimine+N:ideologis´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ideoloog+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ideol´oog TAUD ;
ideoloogia+N:ideol´oogia AASTA ;
ideoloogiatöötaja+N:ideol´oogia#t´öötaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idiolekt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`idiol´ekt TAUD ;
idiomaatika+N:idiomaatika AASTA ;
idioodikas+N:idioodika LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idioom+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idi´oom TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idioot+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idi´oot TAUD ;
idiootia+N:idi´ootia AASTA ;
idiootiahaige+N:idi´ootia#h´aige AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idiootlikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idi`ootl´ikkus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idiootsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idi´ootsus SUULINE ;
idiosünkraasia+N:idiosünkr´aasia AASTA ;
idiotism+N:idiot´ism TAUD ;
@D.Case.Nom@idu+N:@D.Case.Nom@iD1u KAVA ;
@D.Case.Nom@idu+N:@D.Case.Nom@idu KAVA ;
idulane+N:idulane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@idutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@idüll+N:@P.Stem.Nom@id´ül,l TAUD ;
@D.Case.Nom@iga+N:@D.Case.Nom@iG1a%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
igakord+N:iga#k´orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igakülgsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iga#k´ülgsus SUULINE ;
igamees+N:iga#me MEES ;
igamine+N:igamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@igand REDEL ;
iganenu+N:iganenu AASTA ;
igapäev+N:iga#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
igapäevaelu+N:iga#päeva#elu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
igapäevatöö+N:iga#päeva#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igatsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@igatsus OLULINE ;
igatsusvalu+N:igatsus#valu KAVA ;
igavik+N:`igav´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@igavus OLULINE ;
igavustunne+N:igavus#t´unD1e PINGE ;
@D.Case.Nom@ige+N:@D.Case.Nom@ige HAARE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igerikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`iger´ikkus OLULINE ;
igiaeg+N:igi#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
igihali+N:igi#h´al,J1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
igijää+N:igi#j´ää ARMEE ;
igikelts+N:igi#k´elts%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
igiliikur+N:igi#l´iikur REDEL ;
iglu+N:iglu RUBLA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ignorant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ignor´an,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ignorantsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ignor´antsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igrek+N:@P.Stem.Nom@igrek REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iguaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@igu´aan TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iguaanodon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iguaanodon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iguumen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ig´uumen REDEL ;
iha+N:iha KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihaldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihaldus OLULINE ;
ihaleja+N:ihaleja AASTA ;
ihalemine+N:ihalemine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihalevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihalevus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihalus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihalus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iharus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iharus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihastus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iherus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iherus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihitus OLULINE ;
@D.Case.Nom@ihk+N:@D.Case.Nom@´ihK1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
ihkmed+N:´ihK1E2 HAARE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihnsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ihnsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihnur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ihnur REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihnus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ihnus SUULINE ;
ihnuskael+N:´ihnus#k´ael%>%{pl.u%} KAEL ;
ihnuskoi+N:´ihnus#k´oi ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihtüoloog+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ihtüol´oog TAUD ;
ihtüoloogia+N:ihtüol´oogia AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihtüool+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihtü´ool TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihtüoos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iht´üoos TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihtüosaurus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihtüo#s´aurus SUULINE ;
@D.Case.Nom@ihu+N:@D.Case.Nom@ihu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
ihuhirm+N:ihu#h´irm%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ihuhäda+N:ihu#häda%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
ihujõud+N:ihu#j´õuD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ihukaitse+N:ihu#k´aitse PINGE ;
ihukaitsevägi+N:ihu#k´aitse#väG1%{stemill%} NIMI ;
ihukaitsja+N:ihu#k´aitsja AASTA ;
ihukarv+N:ihu#k´arv%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
ihukate+N:ihu#k´atT1e PINGE ;
ihuliige+N:ihu#l´iiK2E2 HAARE ;
ihumiskivi+N:ihumis#kivi%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihunuhtlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihu#n´uhtlus SUULINE ;
ihupesu+N:ihu#pesu KAVA ;
ihuramm+N:ihu#r´amm%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
ihusilm+N:ihu#s´ilm%>%{pl.i%} SILM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihusoojus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ihu#s´oojus SUULINE ;
ihusugu+N:ihu#suG1u KAVA ;
ihutervis+N:ihu#tervis KATKINE ;
ihutis+N:ihutis OLULINE ;
ihutoidus+N:ihu#toidus SOOLANE ;
ihutoit+N:ihu#t´oit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ihuvari+N:ihu#v´arJ1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ihuviga+N:ihu#viG1a%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
ihuvili+N:ihu#v´il,J1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
ihuvärv+N:ihu#v´ärv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iibis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iibis SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iidid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´iid, TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iidol+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´iidol REDEL ;
@D.Case.Nom@iil+N:@D.Case.Nom@´iil TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@iileks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@iileks REDEL ;
